Texas, session 891, SB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 43.101, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 43.101.  1ST JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of [Sabine and] San Augustine County [counties] elect a district attorney for the 1st Judicial District who represents the state in the [that] district courts in that county [court only in those counties]. SECTION 2.  Subchapter B, Chapter 43, Government Code, is amended by adding Section 43.1742 to read as follows: Sec. 43.1742.  273RD JUDICIAL DISTRICT. The voters of Sabine County elect a district attorney for the 273rd Judicial District who represents the state in the district courts in that county. SECTION 3.  Section 46.002, Government Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 46.002.  PROSECUTORS SUBJECT TO CHAPTER.  This chapter applies to the state prosecuting attorney, all county prosecutors, and the following state prosecutors: (1)  the district attorneys for Kenedy and Kleberg Counties and for the 1st, 2nd, 8th, 9th, 18th, 21st, 23rd, 24th, 26th, 27th, 29th, 31st, 32nd, 33rd, 34th, 35th, 36th, 38th, 39th, 42nd, 43rd, 46th, 47th, 49th, 50th, 51st, 52nd, 53rd, 63rd, 64th, 66th, 69th, 70th, 76th, 79th, 81st, 83rd, 84th, 85th, 88th, 90th, 97th, 100th, 105th, 106th, 109th, 110th, 112th, 118th, 119th, 123rd, 132nd, 142nd, 143rd, 145th, 156th, 159th, 173rd, 196th, 198th, 216th, 220th, 229th, 235th, 253rd, 258th, 259th, 266th, 268th, 271st, 273rd, 286th, 287th, 329th, 344th, 349th, 355th, 369th, 452nd, and 506th judicial districts; (2)  the criminal district attorneys for the counties of Anderson, Austin, Bastrop, Bexar, Bowie, Brazoria, Caldwell, Calhoun, Cass, Collin, Comal, Dallas, Deaf Smith, Denton, Eastland, Fannin, Galveston, Grayson, Gregg, Harrison, Hays, Hidalgo, Jasper, Jefferson, Kaufman, Kendall, Lubbock, McLennan, Madison, Medina, Navarro, Newton, Panola, Polk, Randall, Rockwall, San Jacinto, Smith, Tarrant, Taylor, Tyler, Upshur, Van Zandt, Victoria, Walker, Waller, Wichita, Wood, and Yoakum; and (3)  the county attorneys performing the duties of district attorneys in the counties of Andrews, Aransas, Burleson, Callahan, Cameron, Castro, Colorado, Crosby, Ellis, Falls, Freestone, Gonzales, Guadalupe, Lamar, Lamb, Lampasas, Lavaca, Lee, Limestone, Marion, Milam, Morris, Ochiltree, Oldham, Orange, Rains, Red River, Robertson, Rusk, Swisher, Terry, Webb, and Willacy. SECTION 4.  (a)  The office of district attorney for the 273rd Judicial District is created on the effective date of this Act. (b)  The office of district attorney for the 273rd Judicial District exists for purposes of the primary and general elections in 2028. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2029.